nb: Monteringsmateriale: Aluminium; Messing; Keramikk; Krom; Glass; Skinn; Metall; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Polypropylen (PP); Gummi; Rustfritt stål; Stål; Vinyl; Trevirke; Annet
el: Υλικό στηρίγματος: Αλουμίνιο; Ορείχαλκος; Κεραμικό; Χρώμιο; Γυαλί; Δέρμα; Μέταλλο; Νάιλον; Πλαστικό; Πολυεστέρας; Πολυπροπυλένιο (PP); Καουτσούκ; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Χάλυβας; Βινύλιο; Ξύλο; Άλλο
ru: Материал крепления: Алюминий; Латунь; Керамика; Хром; Стеклянные; Кожа; Металл; Нейлон; Пластик; Полиэстер; Полипропилен (ПП); Резина; Нержавеющая сталь; Сталь; Винил; Дерево; Другой
cs: Materiál držáku: Hliník; Mosaz; Keramika; Chrom; Sklo; Kůže; Kov; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Polypropylen (PP); Guma; Nerezová ocel; Ocel; Vinylové; Dřevo; Jiné
ro-RO: Material suport: Aluminiu; Alamă; Ceramic; Crom; Sticlă; Piele; Metal; Nailon; Plastic; Poliester; Polipropilenă (PP); Cauciuc; Oțel inoxidabil; Oțel; Vinyl; Lemn; Altele
vi: Vật liệu gắn kết: Nhôm; Đồng; Gốm; Chrome; Thủy tinh; Da; Kim loại; Nylon; Nhựa; Polyester; Polypropylene (PP); Cao su; Thép không gỉ; Thép; Nhựa vinyl; Gỗ; Khác
es: Material del montaje: Aluminio; Latón; Cerámica; Cromo; Vidrio; Cuero; Metal; Nylon; Plástico; Poliéster; Polipropileno (PP); Goma; Acero inoxidable; Acero; Vinilo; Madera; Otros
lt-LT: Laikiklio medžiaga: Aliuminis; Žalvaris; Keramika; Chromas; Stiklas; Oda; Metalas; Nailonas; Plastikas; Poliesteris; Polipropilenas (PP); Kaučiukas; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Plienas; Vinilas; Mediena; Kita
zh-CN: 底座材料: 铝; 黄铜; 陶瓷制品; 铬合金; 玻璃; 皮革; 金属; 尼龙; 塑料; 聚酯纤维; 聚丙烯 (PP); 橡胶; 不锈钢; 钢; 乙烯基贴纸; 木头; 其他
sk-SK: Montážny materiál: Hliník; Mosadz; Keramika; Chróm; Sklo; Koža; Kov; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Polypropylén (PP); Guma; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Oceľ; Vinyl; Drevo; Iné
pt-BR: Material de montagem: Alumínio; Latão; Cerâmica; Cromado; Vidro; Couro; Metal; Nylon; Plástico; Poliéster; Polipropileno (PP); Borracha; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Vinil; Madeira; Outro
da: Monteringsmateriale: Aluminum; Messing; Keramik; Krom; Glas; Læder; Metal; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Polypropylen (PP); Gummi; Rustfrit stål; Stål; Vinyl; Træ; Andet
ko: 마운트 소재: 알루미늄; 황동; 세라믹; 크로뮴; 유리; 가죽; 금속; 나일론; 플라스틱; 폴리에스테르; 폴리프로필렌(PP); 고무; 스테인리스 스틸; 강철; 비닐; 목재; 기타
fi: Kiinnitysmateriaali: Alumiini; Messinki; Keraaminen; Kromi; Lasi; Nahka; Metalli; Nailon; Muovi; Polyesteri; Polypropeeni (PP); Kumi; Ruostumaton teräs; Teräs; Vinyyli; Puu; Muu
pt-PT: Material de montagem: Alumínio; Latão; Cerâmica; Cromado; Vidro; Pele; Metal; Náilon; Plástico; Poliéster; Polipropileno (PP); Borracha; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Vinil; Madeira; Outro
hr-HR: Materijal nosača: Aluminij; Mjed; Keramika; Krom; Staklo; Koža; Metal; Najlon; Plastika; Poliester; Polipropilen (PP); Guma; Nehrđajući čelik; Čelik; Vinil; Drvo; Ostalo
bg-BG: Материал за монтиране: Алуминий; Месинг; Керамика; Хром; Стъкло; Кожа; Метал; Найлон; Пластмаса; Полиестер; Полипропилен (PP); Каучук; Неръждаема стомана; Стомана; Винил; Дърво; Други
de: Montagematerial: Aluminium; Messing; Keramik; Chrom; Glas; Leder; Metall; Nylon; Kunststoff; Polyester; Polypropylen (PP); Gummi; Edelstahl; Stahl; Vinyl; Holz; Sonstiges
pl: Materiał montażowy: Aluminium; Mosiądz; Ceramika; Chrome; Szkło; Skórzane; Metal; Nylon; Tworzywo sztuczne; Poliester; Polipropylen (PP); Guma; Stal nierdzewna; Stal; Winyl; Drewno; Inne
sl-SI: Montažni material: Aluminij; Medenina; Keramika; Krom; Steklo; Usnje; Kovina; Najlon; Plastika; Poliester; Polipropilen (PP); Guma; Nerjavno jeklo; Jeklo; Vinil; Les; Drugo
hu: Tartó anyaga: Alumínium; Sárgaréz; Kerámia; Króm; Üveg; Bőr; Fém; Nejlon; Műanyag; Poliészter; Polipropilén (PP); Gumi; Rozsdamentes acél; Acél; Vinil; Fa; Egyéb
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำตัวยึด: อะลูมิเนียม; ทองเหลือง; เซรามิก; สไตล์โครม; แก้ว; หนัง; โลหะ; ไนลอน; พลาสติก; โพลีเอสเตอร์; โพลิโพรพิลีน (PP); ยาง; เหล็กสเตนเลส; เหล็ก; ไวนิล; ไม้; อื่นๆ
tr: Montaj malzemesi: Alüminyum; Pirinç; Seramik; Krom; Cam; Deri; Metal; Plastik; Plastik; Poliyester; Polipropilen (PP); Kauçuk; Paslanmaz çelik; Çelik; Vinil; Ahşap; Diğer
zh-TW: 安裝材料: 鋁; 黃銅; 陶瓷; 鉻; 玻璃; 皮製; 金屬; 尼龍; 塑膠; 聚酯; 聚丙烯 (PP); 橡膠; 不銹鋼; 鋼; 乙烯基; 木材; 其他
sv: Fäste - material: Aluminium; Mässing; Keramisk; Krom; Glas; Läder; Metall; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Polypropen (PP); Gummi; Rostfritt stål; Stål; Vinyl; Trä; Övrigt
en: Mount material: Aluminum; Brass; Ceramic; Chrome; Glass; Leather; Metal; Nylon; Plastic; Polyester; Polypropylene (PP); Rubber; Stainless steel; Steel; Vinyl; Wood; Other
fr: Matériau du support: Aluminum; Laiton; Céramique; Chrome; Verre; Cuir; Métal; Nylon; Plastique; Polyester; Polypropylène (PP); Caoutchouc; Acier inoxydable; Acier; Vinyl; Bois; Autre
nl: Materiaal bevestiging: Aluminium; Messing; Keramiek; Chroom; Glas; Leer; Metaal; Nylon; Plastic; Polyester; Polypropyleen (PP); Rubber; Roestvrij staal; Staal; Vinyl; Hout; Andere
it: Materiale di montaggio: Alluminio; Ottone; Ceramica; Cromo; Vetro; Pelle; Metallo; Nylon; Plastica; Poliestere; Polipropilene (PP); Gomma; Acciaio inossidabile; Acciaio; Vinile; Legno; Altro
ja: マウント材質: アルミニウム; 真鍮; セラミック; クロム; ガラス; レザー; 金属; ナイロン; プラスチック; ポリエステル; ポリプロピレン (PP); ゴム; ステンレススチール; スチール; ビニール; 木材; その他